Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-1649
Chief Water Officer; investigations and studies.

(1) The Chief Water Officer may investigate and gather or cause the owner to gather such data, including advances made in safety practices elsewhere, as may be needed for a proper review and study of the various features of the design, construction, reconstruction, enlargement, alteration, breach, removal, or abandonment of dams.

(2) The Chief Water Officer may make or cause the owner to make such watershed investigations and studies as are necessary to keep abreast of developments affecting runoff and peak storm discharges in the vicinity of a dam.

(3) The Chief Water Officer may make or cause the owner to make such seismic investigations and studies as may be necessary to keep abreast of developments affecting seismic stability of a dam.

Laws 2005, LB 335, § 49;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 287.